Utah statutes.
10-5-103.   Withholding state money of town failing to file budget.
The state auditor is authorized to withhold state money allocated to a town if
that town fails to file a copy of a formally adopted budget or fails to comply
with the annual financial reporting and independent auditing requirements of
this chapter. Such money shall not be withheld if the town substantially
complies with the requirements of this chapter.
